Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2217.04
Trainee real property appraiser, defined.

Trainee real property appraiser means a person who holds a valid credential as a trainee real property appraiser issued under the Real Property Appraiser Act.

Laws 2006, LB 778, § 37;

Laws 2008, LB1011, § 3;

R.S.1943, (2009), § 76-2217.02;

Laws 2014, LB717, § 12;

Laws 2015, LB139, § 34.